Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 208.03, is amended to read: 208.03 NOMINATION OF PRESIDENTIAL ELECTORS AND ALTERNATES. Presidential electors and alternates for the major political parties of this state shall be nominated by delegate conventions called and held under the supervision of the respective state central committees of the parties of this state. new text begin Each major political party shall nominate one presidential elector from each congressional district and two presidential electors from the state at large. new text end At least 71 days before the general election day the chair of the major political party shall certify to the secretary of state the names of the persons nominated as presidential electors, the names of persons nominated as alternate presidential electors, and the names of the party candidates for president and vice president. new text begin For each person nominated as an elector or alternate elector, the chair shall indicate whether the person is nominated as an at-large elector or is nominated to represent a congressional district. If the person is nominated to represent a congressional district, the chair must indicate the congressional district number for each nominee. new text end The chair shall also certify that the party candidates for president and vice president have no affidavit on file as a candidate for any office in this state at the ensuing general election. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 208.05, is amended to read: 208.05 STATE CANVASSING BOARD. The State Canvassing Board at its meeting on the date provided in section 204C.33 shall open and canvass the returns made to the secretary of state for presidential electors and alternates, prepare a statement of the number of votes cast for the persons receiving votes for these officesnew text begin statewide and within each congressional districtnew text end , and declare the person or persons receiving the highest number of votes for each office duly elected, deleted text begin except that if the Agreement Among the States to Elect the President by National Popular Vote governs the appointment of presidential electors, the State Canvassing Board shall declare duly elected the candidates for presidential electors and alternates identified in accordance with the provisions of that agreement.deleted text end new text begin as follows:new text end new text begin (1) the statewide vote totals must be used to determine the persons elected to serve as electors under the at-large designation; and new text end new text begin (2) the vote totals within each congressional district must be used to determine the person elected to serve as an elector representing that district. new text end When it appears that more than the number of persons to be elected as presidential electors or alternates have the highest and an equal number of votes, the secretary of state, in the presence of the board shall decide by lot which of the persons shall be declared electeddeleted text begin , except that if the Agreement Among the States to Elect the President by National Popular Vote governs the appointment of presidential electors, no such drawing of lots shall be conducteddeleted text end . The governor shall transmit to each person declared elected a certificate of election, signed by the governor, sealed with the state seal, and countersigned by the secretary of state. Sec. 3. new text begin WITHDRAWAL.new text end new text begin For purposes of Article IV of the Agreement Among the States to Elect the President by National Popular Vote, this act constitutes withdrawal from agreement, and the governor is directed to inform the chief executives of other agreement states of the withdrawal. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 208.051; and 208.052, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-01195 208.051 AGREEMENT AMONG THE STATES TO ELECT THE PRESIDENT BY NATIONAL POPULAR VOTE. The Agreement Among the States to Elect the President by National Popular Vote is enacted into law and entered into with all other states legally joining in it in substantially the following form: Article I - Membership Any state of the United States and the District of Columbia may become a member of this agreement by enacting this agreement. Article II - Right of the People in Member States to Vote for President and Vice President Each member state shall conduct a statewide popular election for president and vice president of the United States. Article III - Manner of Appointing Presidential Electors in Member States Prior to the time set by law for the meeting and voting by the presidential electors, the chief election official of each member state shall determine the number of votes for each presidential slate in each state of the United States and in the District of Columbia in which votes have been cast in a statewide popular election and shall add such votes together to produce a national popular vote total for each presidential slate. The chief election official of each member state shall designate the presidential slate with the largest national popular vote total as the national popular vote winner. The presidential elector certifying official of each member state shall certify the appointment in that official's own state of the elector slate nominated in that state in association with the national popular vote winner. At least six days before the day fixed by law for the meeting and voting by the presidential electors, each member state shall make a final determination of the number of popular votes cast in the state for each presidential slate and shall communicate an official statement of such determination within 24 hours to the chief election official of each other member state. The chief election official of each member state shall treat as conclusive an official statement containing the number of popular votes in a state for each presidential slate made by the day established by federal law for making a state's final determination conclusive as to the counting of electoral votes by Congress. In event of a tie for the national popular vote winner, the presidential elector certifying official of each member state shall certify the appointment of the elector slate nominated in association with the presidential slate receiving the largest number of popular votes within that official's own state. If, for any reason, the number of presidential electors nominated in a member state in association with the national popular vote winner is less than or greater than that state's number of electoral votes, the presidential candidate on the presidential slate that has been designated as the national popular vote winner shall have the power to nominate the presidential electors for that state and that state's presidential elector certifying official shall certify the appointment of such nominees. The chief election official of each member state shall immediately release to the public all vote counts or statements of votes as they are determined or obtained. This article shall govern the appointment of presidential electors in each member state in any year in which this agreement is, on July 20, in effect in states cumulatively possessing a majority of the electoral votes. Article IV - Other Provisions This agreement shall take effect when states cumulatively possessing a majority of the electoral votes have enacted this agreement in substantially the same form and the enactments by such states have taken effect in each state. Any member state may withdraw from this agreement, except that a withdrawal occurring six months or less before the end of a president's term shall not become effective until a president or vice president shall have been qualified to serve the next term. The chief executive of each member state shall promptly notify the chief executive of all other states of when this agreement has been enacted and has taken effect in that official's state, when the state has withdrawn from this agreement, and when this agreement takes effect generally. This agreement shall terminate if the electoral college is abolished. If any provision of this agreement is held invalid, the remaining provisions shall not be affected. Article V - Definitions For purposes of this agreement: (1) "chief election official" means the state official or body that is authorized to certify the total number of popular votes for each presidential slate; (2) "chief executive" means the governor of a state of the United States or the mayor of the District of Columbia; (3) "elector slate" means a slate of candidates who have been nominated in a state for the position of presidential elector in association with a presidential slate; (4) "presidential elector" means an elector for president and vice president of the United States; (5) "presidential elector certifying official" means the state official or body that is authorized to certify the appointment of the state's presidential electors; (6) "presidential slate" means a slate of two persons, the first of whom has been nominated as a candidate for president of the United States and the second of whom has been nominated as a candidate for vice president of the United States, or any legal successors to such persons, regardless of whether both names appear on the ballot presented to the voter in a particular state; (7) "state" means a state of the United States and the District of Columbia; and (8) "statewide popular election" means a general election in which votes are cast for presidential slates by individual voters and counted on a statewide basis. 208.052 CONFLICT OF LAWS. When the Agreement Among the States to Elect the President by National Popular Vote governs the appointment of presidential electors, the provisions of that agreement shall take precedence over any conflicting law of this state.